Washington statutes.
RCW 35.89.050

Water redemption fund—Sources.

Every city and town shall have power to regulate and control the use and price of water supplied through a water system taken over from a local improvement district.

It shall establish such rates and charges for the water as shall be sufficient after providing for the operation and maintenance of the system to provide for the payment of the water redemption bonds at maturity and of interest thereon as it matures, and such portion shall be included in and collected as a part of the charges made by such city or town for water supplied through such water system and such portion shall be paid into the water redemption fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.89.050. Prior: 1923 c 52 s 5; RRS s 9154-5.]